Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 132C

REDUCED IGNITION PROPENSITY CIGARETTES LAW

Section

132C-1
Purpose

132C-2
Definitions

132C-3
Cigarettes; reduced ignition propensity;

manufacturer
testing

132C-4
Certification; marking; administration

132C-5
State fire council; rules; implementation

132C-6
Penalties; enforcement; attorney general

132C-7
Exemption

132C-8
Existing inventories; consumer testing

132C-9
Reduced ignition propensity cigarette program

special
fund

Note

This chapter shall be repealed if a federal
reduced cigarette ignition propensity standard preempts this chapter. L 2008,
c 218, §3, pt of §6. Act 218, §§4, 6 provide:

"SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the counties may neither enact nor
enforce any ordinance or other local law or regulation conflicting with, or
preempted by, any provision of this Act [enacting chapter 132C and amending
section 132-16] or with any policy of this State expressed by this Act, whether
that policy be expressed by inclusion of a provision in this Act or by
exclusion of that subject from this Act.

...

SECTION 6. This
Act shall take effect on September 30, 2009, and shall be implemented to
coincide with the excise tax incremental increase on cigarettes effective
September 30, 2009, pursuant to section 245-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes;
provided that section 4 shall take effect upon approval of this Act [July 7,
2008]; provided further that section [132C-5(1)], Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall
take effect upon approval of this Act [July 7, 2008]."

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next